North Carolina statutes. Chapter 44. Liens.
Article 11. Uniform Federal Tax Lien Registration Act. [Repealed]

§§ 44-65 through 44-68.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1969, c. 216.

§§ 44-68.1 through 44-68.7.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1989 (Regular Session, 1990), c. 1047, s. 2.

Cross References.

For the Uniform Federal Lien Registration Act, see now

G.S. 44-68.10

et seq.

§§ 44-68.8,
44-68.9.

Reserved for future codification purposes.